Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Business and Community Development 50,693,000 44,345,000 Appropriations by Fund General 48,393,000 42,045,000 Remediation 700,000 700,000 Workforce Development 1,600,000 1,600,000 (a) $2,287,000 each year is for the greater Minnesota business development public infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.431. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (b) $350,000 each year is for the administration of the Energy Transition Office under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.5491. (c) $500,000 each year is for grants to small business development centers under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.68. Money made available under this paragraph may be used to match funds under the federal Small Business Development Center (SBDC) program under United States Code, title 15, section 648, to provide consulting and technical services or to build additional SBDC network capacity to serve entrepreneurs and small businesses. (d) $2,725,000 each year is for the small business assistance partnerships program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.682. All grant awards shall be for two consecutive years. Grants shall be awarded in the first year. The department may use up to five percent of the appropriation for administrative purposes. The base for this appropriation is $1,725,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (e) $1,772,000 each year is for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. The base for this appropriation is $1,022,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (f) $700,000 each year is from the remediation fund for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (g) $139,000 each year is for the Center for Rural Policy and Development. (h) $25,000 each year is for the administration of state aid for the Destination Medical Center Corporation under Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.40 to 469.47. (i) $710,000 the first year and $711,000 the second year are for the host community economic development program established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.548. The base for this appropriation is $875,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (j)(1) $1,500,000 each year is for grants to local communities to increase the number of quality child care providers to support economic development. Fifty percent of grant funds must go to communities located outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. (2) Grant recipients must obtain a 50 percent nonstate match to grant funds in either cash or in-kind contribution, unless the commissioner waives the requirement. Grant funds available under this paragraph must be used to implement projects to reduce the child care shortage in the state, including but not limited to funding for child care business start-ups or expansion, training, facility modifications, direct subsidies or incentives to retain employees, or improvements required for licensing, and assistance with licensing and other regulatory requirements. In awarding grants, the commissioner must give priority to communities that have demonstrated a shortage of child care providers. (3) Within one year of receiving grant funds, grant recipients must report to the commissioner on the outcomes of the grant program, including but not limited to the number of new providers, the number of additional child care provider jobs created, the number of additional child care slots, and the amount of cash and in-kind local funds invested. Within one month of all grant recipients reporting on program outcomes, the commissioner must report the grant recipients' outcomes to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over early learning and child care and economic development. (k) $500,000 each year is for the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships. Of this amount: (1) $450,000 each year is for administration of the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships; and (2) $50,000 each year is for the Labor Market Information Office to conduct research and analysis related to the child care industry. (l) $1,000,000 each year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must use grant money under this paragraph to: (1) facilitate planning processes for rural communities resulting in a community solution action plan that guides decision making to sustain and increase the supply of quality child care in the region to support economic development; (2) engage the private sector to invest local resources to support the community solution action plan and ensure quality child care is a vital component of additional regional economic development planning processes; (3) provide locally based training and technical assistance to rural child care business owners individually or through a learning cohort. Access to financial and business development assistance must prepare child care businesses for quality engagement and improvement by stabilizing operations, leveraging funding from other sources, and fostering business acumen that allows child care businesses to plan for and afford the cost of providing quality child care; and (4) recruit child care programs to participate in quality rating and improvement measurement programs. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must work with local partners to provide low-cost training, professional development opportunities, and continuing education curricula. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must fund through local partners an enhanced level of coaching to rural child care providers to obtain a quality rating through measurement programs. (m) $4,954,000 the first year and $4,955,000 the second year are for the Minnesota job creation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8748. Of this amount, the commissioner of employment and economic development may use up to three percent for administrative expenses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. The base for this appropriation is $5,600,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (n) $12,370,000 each year is for the Minnesota investment fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731. Of this amount, the commissioner of employment and economic development may use up to three percent for administration and monitoring of the program. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731, money appropriated to the commissioner for the Minnesota investment fund may be used for the redevelopment program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761, at the discretion of the commissioner. Grants under this paragraph are not subject to the grant amount limitation under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731. (o) $1,246,000 each year is for the redevelopment program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761. (p) $12,000 each year is for a grant to the Upper Minnesota Film Office. (q) $4,195,000 each year is for the Minnesota job skills partnership program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.01 to 116L.17. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (r) $1,350,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for jobs training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.41. (s) $250,000 each year is for the publication, dissemination, and use of labor market information under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.401. (t) $750,000 each year is for the CanNavigate program established under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.6595. Of this amount, up to four percent may be used for administrative purposes. Any unencumbered balances remaining in the first year do not cancel but are available for the second year. (u) $500,000 each year is for a grant to MNSBIR, Inc., for support of the small business research and development goals provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 3.222. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2027. The purpose of the grant is to support moving scientific excellence and technological innovation from the lab to the market for startups and small businesses by securing federal research and development funding to build a strong innovation economy and stimulate the creation of novel products, services, and solutions; strengthening the role of startups and small businesses in meeting federal research and development needs; increasing the commercial application of federally supported research results; and developing and increasing the Minnesota workforce, especially by fostering and encouraging participation by small businesses owned by people who are Black, Indigenous, People of Color, and women. MNSBIR, Inc. shall use grant money to become the federal research and development dedicated resource for Minnesota small businesses to support research and commercialization of novel ideas, concepts, and projects to develop cutting-edge products and services for worldwide economic impact. Grant money shall be used to: (1) assist startups and small businesses in securing federal research and development funding including the small business innovation research and small business technology transfer programs; (2) support technology transfer and commercialization from the University of Minnesota, Mayo Clinic, and federal laboratories; (3) collaborate with corporate venture groups and large businesses nationally; (4) conduct statewide outreach, education, and training on federal rules, regulations, and requirements; (5) assist with scientific and technical writing; (6) help manage federal grants and contracts; and (7) support cost accounting and federal sole-source procurement opportunities. deleted text begin (v) $5,523,000 the first year is for the PROMISE grant program. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. Of this amount: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $1,105,000 the first year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations to serve businesses in greater Minnesota. Of this amount, $88,000 is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue the prior year; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $4,418,000 the first year is for grants to the Neighborhood Development Center. Of this amount, the following amounts are designated for the following areas: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) $1,105,000 the first year is for North Minneapolis' West Broadway, Camden, and other Northside neighborhoods. Of this amount, $88,000 is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) $1,105,000 the first year is for South Minneapolis' Lake Street, 38th and Chicago, Franklin, Nicollet, and Riverside corridors. Of this amount, $88,000 is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) $1,104,000 the first year is for St. Paul's University Avenue, Midway, Eastside, or other St. Paul neighborhoods. Of this amount, $88,000 is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; and deleted text end deleted text begin (iv) $1,104,000 the first year is for grants to businesses in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington, excluding the cities of Minneapolis and St. Paul. deleted text end deleted text begin The base for this appropriation is $1,402,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. Of this amount, $281,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (1); $1,121,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (2); $281,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (2), item (i); $280,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (2), item (ii); $280,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (2), item (iii); and $280,000 each year is for the purposes of clause (2), item (iv). deleted text end deleted text begin (w)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end $500,000 each year is for a grant to the Neighborhood Development Center (NDC) to support small business programs, including training, lending, business services, and real estate initiatives. Money may be used to assist organizations outside of the seven-county metropolitan area with technical assistance and grants to help implement elements of NDC's small business support model; provide one-on-one technical assistance for entrepreneurs; and support the operations and marketing of a cybersecurity center. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel and is available for use in the second year. deleted text begin (x)deleted text end new text begin (w)new text end $627,000 the first year is for a grant to Community and Economic Development Associates (CEDA) to provide funding for economic development technical assistance and economic development project grants to small communities across rural Minnesota and for CEDA to design, implement, market, and administer specific types of basic community and economic development programs tailored to individual community needs. Technical assistance grants shall be based on need and given to communities that are otherwise unable to afford these services. Of the amount appropriated, up to $270,000 may be used for economic development project implementation in conjunction with the technical assistance received. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available the second year. deleted text begin (y)deleted text end new text begin (x)new text end $200,000 the first year is for a grant to the African Development Center for capacity-building initiatives to support small business growth and sustainability. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. deleted text begin (z)deleted text end new text begin (y)new text end $250,000 each year is for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc. to directly invest in Minnesota manufacturers under the Made in Minnesota program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116O.115. This is a onetime appropriation. deleted text begin (aa)deleted text end new text begin (z)new text end $250,000 each year is for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., to reach and deliver talent, leadership, employee retention, continuous improvement, strategy, quality management systems, revenue growth, and manufacturing peer-to-peer advisory services to small manufacturing companies employing 250 or fewer full-time equivalent employees and for operations of Enterprise Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. No later than February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027, Enterprise Minnesota, Inc. must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that includes: (1) the amount of money awarded during the past 12 months; (2) the estimated financial impact of the money awarded to each company receiving service under the program; (3) the actual financial impact of the money awarded during the past 24 months; and (4) the total amount of federal money leveraged from the Manufacturing Extension Partnership at the United States Department of Commerce. deleted text begin (bb)deleted text end new text begin (aa)new text end $250,000 each year is for a grant to the Coalition of Asian American Leaders to support outreach, training, technical assistance, peer network development, and direct financial assistance targeted to Asian Minnesotan women entrepreneurs and Asian-owned businesses. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. deleted text begin (cc)deleted text end new text begin (bb)new text end $250,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to WomenVenture to support child care providers through business training and shared services programs and to create materials that may be used, at no cost to child care providers, for start-up, expansion, and operation of child care businesses statewide, with the goal of helping new and existing child care businesses in underserved areas of the state become profitable and sustainable. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for WomenVenture's technical assistance and administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. By December 15, 2028, WomenVenture must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and employment and economic development. The report must include a summary of the uses of the appropriation, including the amount of the appropriation used for administration. The report must also provide a breakdown of the amount of funding used for loans, forgivable loans, and grants; information about the terms of the loans issued; a discussion of how money from repaid loans will be used; the number of entrepreneurs assisted; and a breakdown of how many entrepreneurs received assistance in each county. deleted text begin (dd)deleted text end new text begin (cc)new text end $250,000 each year is for a grant to the Latino Economic Development Center to assist, support, finance, and launch microentrepreneurs by delivering training, workshops, and one-on-one consultations to businesses; and to guide prospective entrepreneurs in their start-up process by introducing them to key business concepts, including business start-up readiness. Grant proceeds must be used to offer workshops on a variety of topics throughout the year, including finance, customer service, food-handler training, and food-safety certification. Grant proceeds may also be used to provide lending to business startups. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. deleted text begin (ee)deleted text end new text begin (dd)new text end $150,000 each year is for a grant to Isuroon for the following: (1) providing loans to microbusinesses to promote entrepreneurship and economic growth in underserved communities; (2) awarding grants to microbusinesses to support start-up costs, capacity building, and business sustainability; (3) delivering technical assistance and training to entrepreneurs, including support for business operations, financial management, and development strategies; and (4) establishing and operating a business incubator program to support microbusinesses with shared resources, mentorship, and access to professional networks. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin FUNDING TERMINATION.new text end new text begin Funding for the PROMISE grant program is terminated. Any remaining money is canceled back to the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end